Utah statutes.
8-4-2.   Endowment care cemetery trust funds -- Deposits in endowment fund
-- Reports -- Penalties for failure to file -- Investment of trust fund monies
-- Attestation.
(1)  An endowment care cemetery shall establish an endowment care trust fund
pursuant to Title 75, Chapter 7, Trust Administration.
(a)  Any newly established endowment care cemetery or existing cemetery
converting to an  endowment care cemetery shall deposit a minimum of $25,000
in the endowment care trust fund.
(b)  Each endowment care cemetery shall deposit in the endowment care trust
fund for each plot space sold or disposed of a minimum of:
(i)  $1.50 a square foot for each grave;
(ii)  $15 for each niche; and
(iii)  $60 for each crypt.
(2) (a)  An endowment care cemetery shall collect endowment care funds only
pursuant to a written contract of sale signed by the endowment care cemetery
and the purchaser.
(b)  The contract of sale shall specify the terms of the endowment care trust
consistent with this section and the terms of payment.
(c)  If requested by the purchaser, a copy of the endowment care trust shall
be provided to the purchaser.
(3) (a)  Each endowment care cemetery shall prepare an annual written report
for the benefit of its trustor lot holders.
(b)  The report shall contain:
(i)  information determined to be reasonable and necessary to show compliance
with the provisions of this chapter;
(ii)  the number and square feet of grave space;
(iii)  the number of crypts and niches sold or disposed of under endowment
care during a specific period; and
(iv)  the dollar amount  of sales, amounts paid, amounts receivable, and
amounts deposited in endowment care funds for crypts, niches, and grave space
during a specific period, set forth on the accrual basis as determined by the
cemetery authority.
(c)  An officer of the endowment care cemetery authority shall verify the
report.
(d)  The report shall be on file in the principal office of the endowment care
cemetery and shall be made available upon request.
(e)  The report shall be completed by the 15th day of the third month
following the end of the endowment care cemetery's fiscal year.
(4)  An officer, director, partner, proprietor, or other person having control
of the records of an endowment care cemetery shall provide the reports and
records necessary to comply with the provisions of this chapter.
(5) A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor who willfully and
intentionally fails to:
(a)  deposit funds collected as endowment care funds into the endowment care
trust within 30 days of receipt of the funds; or
(b)  prepare the report required by Subsection (3).
(6)  Endowment care funds may be invested separately or together.  The
investment income shall be divided between the funds in the proportion that
each contributed to the invested amount.
(7)  Endowment care funds shall be invested in accordance with Section
31A-18-105 and Title 75, Chapter 7, Trust Administration.
(8) (a)  An endowment care cemetery shall place endowment care funds with an
independent trustee appointed by the endowment care cemetery.
(b)  A trustee may be independent even if it has common ownership with the
cemetery.
(c)  The independent trustee shall be a depository institution, as defined by
Section 7-1-103, or an insurer, as defined in Section 31A-1-301.
(9) (a)  The trustee shall submit to the endowment care cemetery an annual
independent attestation of the endowment care trust funds.
(b)  The attestation shall state:
(i)  the total amount of the general and special endowment care funds invested
by law;
(ii)  the amount of cash on hand not invested;
(iii)  the location, description, and character of the investments in which
the special endowment care funds are invested;
(iv)  the value of any securities held in the endowment care fund; and
(v)  the actual financial condition of the funds.
(10) (a) A trustee may not receive compensation for services and expenses,
including audits, in excess of 5% of the income derived from an endowment care
fund in any year.
(b)  If there are insufficient funds from the income derived from the
endowment care trust fund to pay for the attestation of the endowment care
funds, the endowment care cemetery shall pay amounts due from funds other than
the endowment care trust fund or income derived from that fund.
(11)  The income from an endowment care fund shall be used for the care,
maintenance, and embellishment of the cemetery as determined by the endowment
care cemetery, and to pay for administering the fund.
